Washington statutes.
RCW 19.178.100

Advertising—Moving sale.

(1) No person may advertise a going out of business sale more than fourteen days before the beginning date of the sale. All advertising of the sale must state the beginning date and must clearly and prominently state the ending date of the sale. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all advertising must be confined to or refer to the address or addresses and place or places of business specified in the notice as going out of business and may not state that other locations or affiliated businesses are cooperating with or participating in the sale unless the other locations or affiliated businesses are included in the notice.

(2) Advertising broadcast on radio is not required to refer to the address or addresses of the business specified in the notice as going out of business, but must meet all other conditions of this section.

(3) No advertising may contain false, misleading, or deceptive statements regarding the nature, duration, merchandise, or other terms of a going out of business sale.

(4) Representations in advertising regarding price savings or discounts on sale merchandise must be bona fide and substantiated.

(5) A moving sale may not be advertised for more than ninety days and may not occur more than once within a twenty-four month period.

[ 1993 c 456 s 12.]